District of Columbia statutes.
47-2823

Baseball, football, and athletic exhibitions; assignment of police and firemen; amusement parks.

(a)

(1)

Owners or managers of grounds used for baseball, football, or other athletic exhibitions to which an admission fee is charged, directly or indirectly, shall pay a license fee of $17 per annum.

(2)

When, in the opinion of the Chief of Police and Fire Chief of the District of Columbia, or either of them, it is necessary to post policemen or firemen, or both, at, on, and about the licensed premises for the protection of the public safety, in addition to the license fee provided for above, such owners or managers shall pay a further monthly permit fee, to be determined monthly by the said Chief of Police and Fire Chief, or either of them, based upon a reasonable estimate of the number of hours to be spent by policemen and firemen, or either of them, at, on, and about the licensed premises, such fee to be payable in advance on the first day of the month for which the permit is sought. Policemen and firemen so assigned shall be charged for by the hour at the basic hourly wage rate of the policemen and firemen so assigned in effect on the first day of the month for which the permit is sought.

(b)

Owners or managers of grounds used for amusement parks, to which an admission is charged, directly or indirectly, other than those used for athletic exhibitions, shall pay a license fee of $208 per annum. Annual licenses issued under this section shall date from April 1st in each year.

(c)

Any license issued pursuant to this section shall be issued as an Entertainment endorsement to a basic business license under the basic business license system as set forth in subchapter I-A of this chapter.

History

July 1, 1902, 32 Stat. 625, ch. 1352, § 7, par. 23
July 1, 1932, 47 Stat. 554, ch. 366
June 29, 1948, 62 Stat. 1109, ch. 735, § 3
Sept. 14, 1976, D.C. Law 1-82, title I, § 104(n), 23 DCR 2461
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 2003(pp)(20), 46 DCR 3142
Oct. 28, 2003, D.C. Law 15-38, § 3(hh)(4)(J), 50 DCR 6913

Cross References

Mayor, Council and other offices, application of certain sections to boards, commissions and committees, see § 1-321.02.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2823.
1973 Ed., § 47-2323.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 15-38, in subsec. (c), substituted “an Entertainment endorsement to a basic business license under the basic” for “a Class A Entertainment endorsement to a master business license under the master”.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(hh)(4)(J) of Streamlining Regulation Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-145, August 11, 2003, 50 DCR 6896).

Editor's Notes

Office of Major and Superintendent of Metropolitan Police abolished: The Office of the Major and Superintendent of Metropolitan Police was abolished and all functions of that office transferred to and vested in the Chief of Police. The Assistant Superintendent, Executive Officer of the Metropolitan Police Department was designated “Deputy Chief of Police, Executive Officer”; the Assistant Superintendent of the Metropolitan Police in command of the Detective Bureau was designated “Deputy Chief of Police, Chief of Detectives”; and each other Assistant Superintendent of the Metropolitan Police was designated “Deputy Chief of Police” by Reorganization Order No. 7, dated September 16, 1952. Reorganization Order No. 7 was replaced by Organization Order No. 153, dated November 10, 1966.

Office of Chief Engineer abolished: The Office of Chief Engineer of the Fire Department was abolished and all functions of that office transferred to and vested in the Fire Chief. The Deputy Chief Engineer of the Fire Department was designated “Deputy Fire Chief,” and the Battalion Chief Engineer was designated “Battalion Fire Chief” by Reorganization Order No. 6, dated September 16, 1952, issued pursuant to Reorganization Plan No. 5 of 1952. Reorganization Order No. 38, dated June 18, 1953, established a Fire Department headed by the Fire Chief. The Fire Chief was given full authority over the Department to be exercised in accordance with applicable laws, rules and regulations. The Order set up the organization of the Department, and provided that the previously existing Fire Department was abolished and its functions transferred to the new Department. This Order was issued pursuant to Reorganization Plan No. 5 of 1952.